Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,198
Registrant; seal; certificate of registration; presumption of registration.

Each registrant shall provide himself with a suitable seal with a uniform inscription thereon formulated by the board with which he shall stamp all plans, specifications, and reports prepared by him. A certificate of registration as provided for in sections 81-8,184 to 81-8,208 shall be presumptive evidence that the person named therein is legally registered.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 15, p. 1864.